Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5 Licenses Generally

3-5-1.
License required for manufacture, sale, or importation of beverages.

No person shall at any time manufacture or sell or suffer to be manufactured or sold or keep or suffer to be kept on his or her premises or possession or under his or her charge for the purpose of sale within this state any beverage unless licensed to do so as provided in this title; and except as provided in this title no person shall import, or suffer to be imported beverages into this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-1

.

3-5-2.
Local option — Questions put to electors — Petition for election.

In every election in every town and city, held for the election of town or city officers, the official or officials charged with the duty of preparing the official ballot labels, shall cause to be printed on these ballot labels the following questions:

“Shall licenses for the sale of beverages as defined in chapters 5, 6, and 7 of title 3, be issued in this town (or city)?”

“Shall retailers’ Class C beverage licenses provided for in §

3-7-8

, be issued in this town (or city)?”

No vote may be taken on either of those questions in any town or city unless a number of qualified electors equal in cities to ten percent (10%) and in towns to fifteen per cent (15%) of the total legal vote cast in the city or town for governor at the general election next preceding shall petition the clerk or the official acting as the secretary or clerk of the board of canvassers and registration, or the board, body or official exercising in that town or city the powers of such a board, at least twenty (20) days prior to the election and the clerk or other official shall, on the petition, insert a provision for the taking of the vote or votes in the warrant calling the town, ward or district meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 25; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 171, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-2

.

3-5-3.
Tabulation of votes.

The results of the vote upon questions submitted in the towns and cities shall be counted and tabulated in the manner provided for in chapter 19 of title 17.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 25; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 171, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-3

.

3-5-4.
Denial of licenses after adverse vote.

If a majority of ballots cast on which the electors have indicated their choice upon the first of the questions in §

3-5-2

is against the granting of licenses, no license for the sale of beverages mentioned in the question shall be issued under the provisions of this chapter and chapters 6 and 7 of this title in the town or city for the two (2) years beginning December second after the election, nor until a majority of the electors of the town or city who vote in response to the question at a subsequent election in the town or city vote affirmatively on this question. If a majority of the ballots cast on which the electors have indicated their response to the second of the questions in §

3-5-2

is against the granting of the license mentioned in the question, no license shall be issued in the town or city during the same two (2) years, nor until a majority of the electors in the town or city, who vote in response to the question shall, at a subsequent similar election, vote affirmatively on this question. Nothing contained in this section prevents the granting of a license for the manufacture of beverages in any city or town to be sold for export beyond the state, or to any person authorized to sell those beverages in any city or town in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 25; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 171, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-4

.

3-5-5.
Towns and cities in which licenses authorized.

It is lawful in every town and city in this state, except in the town of Barrington, to issue licenses for the manufacture, keeping for sale, and sale of beverages in these cities and towns and if upon any referendum provided for in §

3-5-2

the majority of the ballots cast in the town of Barrington are in favor of granting licenses for the sale of nonintoxicating or intoxicating beverages, then licenses may be issued for the sale in that town of beverages in accordance with the result of that referendum; and provided, further, that no license for the sale of nonintoxicating beverages or of intoxicating beverages shall be issued in any town or city in this state if a majority of the ballots on which the electors in these cities or towns have indicated their response to the appropriate question are opposed to the issuing of those licenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 4; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-5

.

3-5-6.
Classes of licenses.

There are several classes of beverage licenses, each of which authorizes the doing of things stated in the chapter and sections concerning the class of license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-6

.

3-5-7.
Wholesale and retail sales distinguished.

The sale of malt beverages in quantities of more than eight (8) gallons and the sale of vinous beverages and of beverages consisting in whole or in part of alcohol, which is the product of distillation in quantities of more than three (3) gallons, constitutes a sale by wholesale, and a sale of those beverages in lesser quantities constitutes a sale at retail; provided, that the sale of any quantity of beverages to a nonlicense holder constitutes a sale at retail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-7

.

3-5-8.
Expiration date of licenses.

Every license except retailer’s Class F licenses and retailer’s Class G licenses shall expire on December 1 after its issuance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-8

.

3-5-9.
Premises covered.

Not more than one retail license, except in the case of a retailer’s Class E license, shall be issued for the same premises. Every license shall particularly describe the place where the rights under the license are to be exercised and beverages shall not be manufactured or kept for sale or sold by any licensee except at the place described in his or her license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-9

; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 7.

3-5-10.
Residence of licensees and qualifications of persons and corporations as licensee.

Except as otherwise provided, licenses are issued only to citizens who are residents of this state. It is not required that dining car companies, sleeping car companies, railroad companies operating in this state, or companies operating passenger-carrying marine vessels in this state be citizens of this state in order to be eligible to receive retailers’ Class G licenses. Retailer’s licenses may, however, be issued to corporations incorporated in any other of the United States which are authorized by the secretary of state to transact business in this state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a)(1) of this section, no license shall be issued, granted, renewed, or transferred to any trust or trustee or to any corporation of which any share or shares of stock or other indicia of ownership or control are owned or held by any trust, or trustee, business organization, or other entity or person other than a natural person or corporation authorized by the secretary of state to transact business in this state; provided, however, that this subsection shall not affect any grant, renewal, or transfer of a license which occurred prior to the effective date of this subsection [June 15, 2000].

In applications for beverage licenses by corporations except those having more than twenty-five (25) stockholders, the names and addresses of all officers and members of the board of directors and of all stockholders shall be filed with the board, body, or official to whom application is made. No beverage license shall be issued to the corporation unless each officer, director or stockholder is a suitable person to hold a license within the discretion of the board, body or official to whom application is made.

All those corporations holding beverage licenses shall report to the board, body or official who issued the licenses the name of any newly elected officer or director and the acquisition by any person of more than ten percent (10%) of any class of corporate stock, within thirty (30) days after the election or acquisition. Thereupon, the board, body or official may call a hearing, at its discretion, to determine whether the new officer, director or stockholder is a suitable person under this section and the board, body or official may revoke or suspend the license if the new officer or director or stockholder is not a suitable person to hold a license.

No person shall acquire fifty percent (50%) or more of any class of the stock of any corporation licensed under this section, except corporations having more than twenty-five (25) stockholders, unless permission for the acquisition is first given by the board, body or official who issued the license. Application for permission to acquire stock is subject to the provisions of §

3-5-19

relating to the transfer of a license to another person except that it shall not be necessary that a new bond be given. Unless the board, body or official determines that the person seeking permission to acquire fifty per cent (50%) or more of the corporation’s stock is a suitable person to hold a license, the permission shall not be given.

The beverage license of a corporation is subject to suspension or revocation for failure to comply with any of the provisions of this section or for any fraud or misrepresentation in connection with the beverage license.

Applicants for beverage licenses shall make full disclosure in their applications for a license of any interest, whether direct or indirect, by any other person, firm or corporation in the license applied for, and failure to do so or any misrepresentation by the applicant may be cause for denial of the application or revocation of the license if granted by the board, body or official issuing the license.

The board, body or official issuing beverage licenses may also deny applications of persons who have criminal records, or who have records of repeated violations of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 17; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-10

; P.L. 1963, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 48, § 1.

3-5-11.
Licensing of chain stores.

Licenses, except retailer’s Class E, Class B, Class B-H, Class B-L, Class B-M, and Class B-V licenses, authorized by this title shall not be granted, issued, or transferred to or for the use of any “chain store organization,” which term shall consist of any chain of retail or wholesale business or business organizations, and more specifically defined herein, including, without limitation, grocery stores, markets, department stores, and convenience stores, as well as retailers of alcoholic beverages, and which include chains in which one or more stores are located outside of the state.

The term “chain store organization” is defined to include, but not limited to:

Any group of one or more holders of Class A liquor licenses who engage in one or more of the following practices with respect to the business conducted under such licenses, either directly or indirectly, or have any direct or indirect beneficial interest in the following practices:

Common, group, centralized or coordinated purchases of wholesale merchandise.

Common billing or utilization of the services of the same person or the same entity in the management or operation of more than one liquor licensed business.

Participation in a coordinated or common advertisement with one or more liquor licensed business in any advertising media.

Coordinated or common planning or implementation of marketing strategies.

Participation in agreed upon or common pricing of products.

Any term or name identified as a chain or common entity.

Any group of one or more liquor license holders who share any of the following common features, either directly or indirectly or acquire any direct or indirect beneficial interest in the following practices:

The same director of a corporation, member of a LLC, LLP, partner in a general or limited partnership, trustee or beneficiary of a trust.

The same individual or corporate owners.

Any group of one or more license holders that is found to be a “chain store organization” as a factual matter by the department, as a result of an evidentiary hearing in connection with any application for the issuance, grant or transfer of a license, or upon the filing of a complaint by any member of the public.

Upon a finding of violation of this section, the department shall be empowered to set a fine up to the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violating licensee, revoke the license of the violator, or suspend the license of the violator for a period of time to be determined by the department. Additionally, the department shall issue a cease and desist order against the violating chain store entity(s) and may further order the dissolution of the violating chain store entity(s).

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 6; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-11

; P.L. 1990, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 421, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 469, § 1.

3-5-11.1.
Liquor franchises prohibited.

To promote the effective and reasonable control and regulation of the Rhode Island alcoholic beverage industry and to help the consumer by protecting their choices and ensuring equitable pricing. Class A liquor license authorized by this title shall not be granted, issued, renewed, or transferred to or for the use of any liquor franchisor or franchisee. Class A liquor license holders are expressly prohibited from utilizing the provisions of the Rhode Island Franchise Investment Act, chapter 28.1 of title 19.

Any franchise agreements involving the retail sales of alcoholic beverages are hereby declared null and void and illegal as of the effective date of this section [April 1, 2005].

Any franchise agreements involving the retail sales of alcoholic beverages shall be terminated by the franchisor or the franchisee within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this section.

Upon finding of a violation of this section by either the franchisor or the licensee, the department shall be empowered to set a fine up to the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violating franchisor or licensee, revoke the license of the violator or suspend the license of the violator for a period of time to be determined by the department. Additionally, the department shall have the power to revoke or suspend the franchise registration in accordance with §

19-28.1-18

and to order it to cease and desist from all operations that are violative of the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this chapter to the contrary, this act shall not be construed as to prevent the utilization of duly licensed professionals rendering services as independent contractors.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 376, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 469, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 3.

3-5-12.
Licensees to keep or sell legal beverages only — Minimum size of containers.

Only beverages which have been legally manufactured and on which all taxes and charges, federal and state, have been paid, shall be kept for sale or sold by a licensee. Holders of Class B, C, D, I and J licenses shall not have on the licensed premises distilled or vinous beverages in the containers, nor bottles, flasks or containers of less capacity than twenty-three ounces (23 oz.). Holders of Class B wholesaler’s licenses, Class G retailer’s licenses, Class B-H retailer’s licenses and Class A retailer’s licenses are authorized to keep for sale and to sell distilled beverages in containers of a minimum capacity of fifty milliliters (50 mls.) or one and seven tenths ounces (1.7 oz.).

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 3004, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-12

; P.L. 1966, ch. 218, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 535, § 1.

3-5-13.
Consumption of distilled liquors on premises.

Licenses to be issued under this chapter shall in no case authorize the sale for consumption on the premises where sold of distilled liquors, or of beverages composed wholly or partly of those liquors, unless these sales are authorized by this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-13

.

3-5-14.
Licenses issued by department of business regulation.

The right, power, and jurisdiction to issue manufacturer’s, wholesaler’s, or retailer’s Class G and Class I licenses are solely in the department of business regulation; provided, that before the department issues any Class I license it shall first receive the approval of the licensing authority of the town or city in which the premises covered by the Class I license are located; and provided, that the number of Class I licenses in the state shall be limited to one to each twenty-five thousand (25,000) of its inhabitants as determined by the latest census taken under the authority of the United States or of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 11; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-14

.

3-5-14.1.
Licenses issued by the department of business regulation.

The right, power, and jurisdiction to issue manufacturer’s and wholesaler’s licenses are solely in the department. The department has the right and power to limit the number of manufacturer’s and wholesaler’s licenses of each class.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 8.

3-5-15.
Local licensing authorities.

The right, power, and jurisdiction to issue all other licenses authorized by this title within the maximum number to be fixed as provided in §

3-5-16

are in the town councils or license boards of the several towns, and in the mayors and city councils in the several cities. However, where a police commission exists in a town or in a city that police commission has the right, power, and jurisdiction to issue those other licenses. If there is neither a city council nor a police commission in a city, the right, power, and jurisdiction shall be in the mayor and council. In the city of Providence the right, power, and jurisdiction are in the bureau of licenses. In the several cases where the town councils or license boards of the several towns, the mayors and city councils of the several cities, or the mayor and council of a city are authorized to issue licenses, they are for that purpose constituted license commissioners, and in those cases the town or city clerk is the clerk of those commissioners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 11; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2721, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-15

.

3-5-16.
Maximum number of licenses.

The department of business regulation shall have the right and power to limit the number of licenses of each class. The limit shall not exceed the maximum number, if any, of any class of license that is fixed by the licensing boards within their respective towns or cities.

The number of Class C licenses in any town or city shall not exceed one for each one thousand (1,000) of its inhabitants.

Every city and town may grant in any year renewals of any license of Class A in operation prior to April 28, 1969, except when renewal of that license is refused for cause, but no further new and original licenses of Class A shall be granted until the number of licenses of Class A outstanding in any city or town has been reduced to less than one for each six thousand (6,000) of its inhabitants (one for each four thousand (4,000) of its inhabitants in any city or town with less than twenty thousand (20,000) inhabitants), as determined by the last census taken under the authority of the United States or the state, by cancellation, revocation, or the failure of holders of those licenses to apply for renewals. After that reduction to less than one for each six thousand (6,000) inhabitants (one for each four thousand (4,000) inhabitants in any town or city with less than twenty thousand (20,000) inhabitants), licenses of Class A may be granted in any year by any city or town only up to a total not exceeding one for each six thousand (6,000) of its inhabitants (one for each four thousand (4,000) of its inhabitants in any town or city with less than twenty thousand (20,000) inhabitants) as determined by census as required in this subsection. However, two (2) Class A licenses may be issued by every city or town of the state irrespective of population and, until the qualified electors of any city or town shall vote to the contrary, one Class A license may be issued in every city or town in this state unless otherwise ordered by the city or town council.

Any Class A license issued to or held by a Class E licensee pursuant to the provisions of §

3-7-5

shall be included in the total of, and subject to the limit upon the number of, Class A licenses which may be granted by any city or town under this section.

The transfer of any existing license from the holder of this license to another person shall not be considered as the issuance of a new license under this section.

The several cities and towns, except those cities and towns that had in effect on June 1, 1971, a limit on the number of retailers’ Class B or D licenses, shall not issue any new retailers’ Class B or D licenses until May 1, 1972. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any application filed on or before May 30, 1971.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, irrespective of the population of the town of Smithfield, it is expressly authorized to issue a total of five (5) Class A liquor licenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 16; P.L. 1936, ch. 2338, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 10; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 10; P.L. 1941, ch. 1038, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 3004, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-16

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1959, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 44, § 1.

3-5-16.1.
Revocation of abandoned Class A licenses.

Whenever it comes to the attention of any local licensing authority as defined in §

3-5-15

that the holder of a Class A license has abandoned the premises from which the licensee has been conducting his or her business or has ceased to operate under the license for a period of ninety (90) days or more then after hearing with due notice to the licensee the local licensing authority shall cancel the license; provided, that the authority may grant a reasonable period of time, not to exceed one year, to the licensee within which to reestablish the business where the abandonment or cessation of operating was due to illness, death, condemnation of business premises, fire or other casualty.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

3-5-16.1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 63, § 1.

3-5-17.
Notice and hearing on licenses.

Before granting a license to any person under the provisions of this chapter and title, the board, body or official to whom application for the license is made, shall give notice by advertisement published once a week for at least two (2) weeks in some newspaper published in the city or town where the applicant proposes to carry on business, or, if there is no newspaper published in a city or town, then in some newspaper having a general circulation in the city or town. Applications for retailer’s Class F, P and Class G licenses need not be advertised. The advertisement shall contain the name of the applicant and a description by street and number or other plain designation of the particular location for which the license is requested. Notice of the application shall also be given, by mail, to all owners of property within two hundred feet (200´) of the place of business seeking the application. The notice shall be given by the board, body or official to whom the application is made, and the cost of the application shall be borne by the applicant. The notices shall state that remonstrants are entitled to be heard before the granting of the license, and shall name the time and place of the hearing. At the time and place a fair opportunity shall be granted the remonstrants to make their objections before acting upon the application; provided that no advertisement or notice need be given pursuant to this section when a license holder applies for a temporary seasonal expansion of an existing liquor license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 20; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-17

; P.L. 1977, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 241, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 366, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 501, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 511, § 1.

3-5-18.
Signature on licenses — Posting and exhibition.

All retail licenses issued under chapter 7 of this title shall bear the signature, or electronic signature, of the clerk of the licensing board, body, or officials issuing them, and shall not be printed, stamped, typewritten, engraved, photographed, or cut from one instrument and attached to another and shall be displayed by the licensee, on the premises, and shall be exhibited on demand to any deputy sheriff, to any city or town sergeant, constable, officer or member of the city or town police or to any member of the department of state police or agent of the department.

All retail licenses shall be displayed within the premises but need not be posted. The license shall be exhibited to any deputy sheriff of the county, to any city or town sergeant, constable, officer or member of the city or town police or to any member of the department of state police or agent of the department who request proof that the establishment is duly licensed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-18

; P.L. 1970, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 638, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 8; P.L. 2018, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 289, § 1.

3-5-19.
Transfer or relocation of license.

The board, body or official which has issued any license under this title may permit the license to be used at any other place within the limits of the town or city where the license was granted, or, in their discretion, permit the license to be transferred to another person, but in all cases of change of licensed place or of transfer of license, the issuing body shall, before permitting the change or transfer, give notice of the application for the change or transfer in the same manner as is provided in this chapter in the case of original application for the license, and a new bond shall be given upon the issuance of the license provided, that notice by mail need not be made in the case of a transfer of a license without relocation. In all cases of transfer of license, indebtedness of the licensee incurred in the operation of the licensed premises shall be paid to or released by an objecting creditor before the issuing body permits the transfer. In cases of dispute as to the amount of indebtedness, the issuing body, may, in its discretion, permit the transfer upon statement of the licensee, under oath, that the claim of indebtedness is disputed and that the statement of dispute is not interposed for the purpose of inducing transfer of the license. No creditor is allowed to object to the transfer of a license by a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for the benefit of creditors, executor, administrator, guardian or by any public officer under judicial process. In case of the death of any licensee, the license becomes part of the personal estate of the deceased. The holders of any retail Class A license within the city or town issuing or transferring a Class A license have standing to be heard before the board, body, or official granting or transferring the license.

The transfer of a license is contingent upon the full payment of outstanding police detail bills.

The transferee of a license assumes all penalties that the license board has imposed upon the transferor of the license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-19

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1959, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 423, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 309, § 1.

3-5-20.
Rules and regulations — Notice and procedure.

All licenses issued shall be in any form prescribed by the department of business regulation and the license shall be held under any rules and regulations as the department shall impose, establish, and authorize and the department is authorized to establish rules and regulations and to authorize the making of any rules and regulations by the licensing authority of the several towns and cities as in their discretions in the public interest seem proper to be made. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, the adoption or authorization of rules and regulations by the department and the modification or repeal of any rules and regulations previously adopted shall be by written order of the department and adopted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 5; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-20

.

3-5-20.1.
Manufacturer’s and wholesaler’s licenses — Notice and procedure.

All manufacturer’s and wholesaler’s licenses to be issued under this chapter shall be in any form prescribed by the department. The licensee shall be held liable under any rules and regulations that the department shall impose, establish and authorize and the department is authorized to establish any rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, the adoption or authorization of rules and regulations by the department and the modification or repeal of any rules and regulations previously adopted shall be by written order of the department and adopted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 8.

3-5-21.
Revocation or suspension of licenses — Fines for violating conditions of license.

Every license is subject to revocation or suspension and a licensee is subject to fine by the board, body, or official issuing the license, or by the department or by the division of taxation, on its own motion, for:

Breach by the holder of the license of the conditions on which it was issued; or

Violation by the holder of the license of any rule or regulation applicable; or

Any fraudulent act or “material misrepresentation” made by an applicant for a license or a licensee, including, but not limited to, any misrepresentation of information upon which the licensing board reasonably relies in rendering any decision concerning a license, licensee, or establishment; or

Breach of any provisions of this chapter; or

Operating in any manner inconsistent with the license, or in any manner consistent with another class license, without first coming before the board for a new license application.

Any fine imposed pursuant to this section shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense and shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent offense. For the purposes of this section, any offense committed by a licensee three (3) years after a previous offense shall be considered a first offense.

In the event that a licensee is required to hire a police detail and the police refuse to place a detail at the location because a licensee has failed to pay outstanding police detail bills or to reach a payment plan agreement with the police department, the license board may prohibit the licensee from opening its place of business until such time as the police detail bills are paid or a payment plan agreement is reached.

Upon any violation by a licensee under §

3-5-21

, the local licensing board, at its sole discretion, may impose a limitation on the hours of operation of the licensee, regardless of the license type, and notwithstanding any prior approval of an application for a later closing time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 5; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-21

; P.L. 1985, ch. 393, § 1; 1988, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 2.

3-5-22.
Reissuance of license after revocation.

In case any license issued is revoked, the board, body or official revoking the license shall, as part of the order of revocation, provide that no license be granted to the same person for the period of one year after the revocation, and in case the order is made, no license shall be issued during the year to the person whose license is revoked.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 11; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-22

.

3-5-23.
Revocation of license for criminal offenses or disorderly conditions — Action on bond.

If any licensed person is convicted of violating any of the provisions of this title, or of chapters 6, 10, 34, or 45 of title 11, or §§

11-2-1

,

11-9-13

,

11-9-15

,

11-11-5

,

11-18-2

—

11-18-4

,

11-20-1

,

11-20-2

,

11-23-4

,

11-30-1

—

11-30-1

1,

11-31-1

or

11-37-2

—

11-37-4

, or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to any complaint or indictment under any of these provisions, or if his or her license is revoked, his or her bond shall be put in suit by the town or city treasurer of the city or town where the bond is given, and by due process of law, the penal sum of the bond shall be recovered for the use of the town or city.

If any licensed person permits the house or place where he or she is licensed to sell beverages under the provisions of this title to become disorderly as to annoy and disturb the persons inhabiting or residing in the neighborhood, or permits any gambling or unlawful gaming to be carried on in the neighborhood, or permits any of the laws of this state to be violated in the neighborhood, in addition to any punishment or penalties that may be prescribed by statute for that offense, he or she may be summoned before the board, body, or official that issued his or her license and before the department, when he or she and the witnesses for and against him or her may be heard. If it appears to the satisfaction of the board, body, or official hearing the charges that the licensee has violated any of the provisions of this title or has permitted any of the things listed in this section, then the board, body, or official may suspend or revoke the license or enter another order.

In case the license is revoked, the licensed person after the revocation shall cease to have any authority under the license and shall be disqualified from holding any of the licenses provided for in this title for a period of five (5) years following the revocation.

The revocation of a license shall not interfere with, or prejudice the right of, recovery upon the licensee’s bond for the full amount of the bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 10; P.L. 1948, ch. 2124, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-23

; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 7; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 42.

3-5-24.
Licensee becoming bail.

If any person holding a license under this title becomes bail for any person complained of for violating any of the provisions of this title, his or her license becomes void as of the day of becoming bail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-24

.

3-5-25.
Antiunion discrimination.

If the department determines that any licensee under this title has discriminated against any employee because that employee is or has become a member of any trade union, the licensee shall forfeit his or her license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 53; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 18; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-25

.

3-5-26.
Records of proceedings — Admission in evidence.

The board, body or official issuing licenses under this title shall keep records of its proceedings and those records are declared to be public records to which the public has the right of access at any reasonable time and under any rules as shall be established by the board, body or official keeping those records.

Copies of those records certified by the secretary or clerk of the board, body or official keeping those records shall be received in any court as evidence of any of the proceedings recorded and the certificate of the clerk that it does not appear by those records that a person named in the certificate holds, or held at any named time, a license under this title shall be evidence of the fact stated in the certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-26

.

3-5-27.
Annual reports.

Boards, bodies or officials in towns or cities issuing licenses under this title shall annually on or before the first day of December, and at any other times required by the department, make a report to the department, which states the number of licenses granted by them lawfully outstanding at the time of the report with the names and addresses of the licensees, and a description of the licensed places, and the amount of money received and any other information required by the department. The department shall make available, by electronic means, the annual reports filed by said towns and cities to provide those reports to members of the public and general assembly upon request.

The department shall, on or before the first day of February in every year, make available on its website, a report showing the number of manufacturers and wholesalers licenses granted by it lawfully outstanding at the time of the report with the names and addresses of licensees and a description of the licensed places, and the division of taxation shall report the amount of money received, showing the amount of beverages of various kinds imported into this state by each licensed dealer and the amount of service charge collected and the general condition affecting the use of beverages in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-5-27

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 105, § 1.